Nebraska, session 109, LB1029.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1029 LB1029
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 85-906, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
85-906 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Contract means any agreement between a covered institution and a
foreign adversarial source for the acquisition by purchase, lease, or
barter of property or services, for the direct benefit or use of the
foreign adversarial source either of the parties;
(b) Covered institution means any public or private two-year or
four-year college or university having a campus or place of business in
Nebraska;
(c) Foreign adversarial source means:
(i) A foreign adversary government, including an agency of a foreign
adversary government;
(ii) A legal entity, governmental or otherwise, created solely under
laws of a foreign adversary government;
(iii) An individual who is a citizen or a national of a foreign
adversary government; and
(iv) An agent of any entity or individual described in subdivision
(1)(c)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this section, including a subsidiary or
affiliate of a foreign adversary legal entity acting on behalf of any
such entity or individual;
(d) Foreign adversary means a foreign adversary as determined
pursuant to 15 C.F.R. 791.4, as such regulation existed on January 1,
2025; and
(e) Reportable funding means revenue or the fair-market value of
anything received as the result of any contract, gift, grant, endowment,
award, scholarship, or donation, including a conditional or unconditional
pledge of a contract, gift, grant, endowment, award, scholarship, or
donation from a foreign adversarial source. Reportable funding does not
include salary, wages, or compensation.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection,
-2-

LB1029 LB1029
2026 2026
each covered institution shall provide a report biannually to the
Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education, in a manner
prescribed by the commission, detailing all reportable funding received
by the covered institution. Unless the information is exempt or
prohibited from disclosure or deemed confidential under federal or state
law, the report shall include the following information:
(i) The amount of the reportable funding and the date that such
funding was received;
(ii) A description of the type of reportable funding and the purpose
for such funding, including whether the reportable funding is part of an
ongoing relationship with the foreign adversarial source;
(iii) A detailed description of the foreign adversarial source
providing the reportable funding, including the name of the foreign
adversarial source and, if not a foreign government, the country of
citizenship, if known, and the country of principal residence or domicile
of the foreign adversarial source; and
(iv) A copy of any contract, agreement, pledge, or memorandum of
understanding associated with the funding.
(b) This section shall not require reporting of payments made to a
covered institution by a natural person who would otherwise qualify as a
foreign adversarial source for tuition or related fees to support an
individual enrolled or planning to attend a covered institution.
(c) The Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education shall
post the report on its public website.
Sec. 2. Original section 85-906, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
is repealed.
-3-